Massachusetts, session 194th, S180.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (b) of Section 2 of chapter 23G of the General Laws, is hereby
amended by striking “9” before the word “members” and replacing it with “12” and adding the
following after the phrase “healthcare financing”:-
1 of whom shall be the executive director of the Coalition for an Equitable Economy or
their designee, 1 of whom shall be a mircorbusiness owner, 1 of whom shall be a small business
owner,
SECTION 2. Section 48 of chapter 23G of the General Laws, is hereby amended by
adding the following subsections:-
(i) The agency shall convene a growth capital advisory board to provide feedback and
guidance to the agency leadership, board of directors, and growth capital division to carry out
this chapter that shall include the secretary of economic development or their designee, the chairs
of the joint committee on economic development and emerging technologies or their designees,
of 2

the executive director of the agency or their designee, the directors of each agency division or
their designees, the chair and at least 3 other members of the agency’s board of directors, the
executive director of the Coalition for an Equitable Economy or their designee, at least 3 socially
or economically disadvantaged small business owners, at least 3 microbusinesses, at least 3 small
business support organizations, at least 3 current or former participants of programs administered
by the growth capital division, provided further that the advisory board may establish
subcommittees related to specific small business assistance programs.
(j) At least 1 small business owner, 1 microbusiness owner, 1 small business support
organization representative, and the executive director of the coalition for an equitable economy
shall serve on every working group and hiring, screening, and advisory committee established by
or for the agency on which other members of the agency’s board of directors serve.
of 2